Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5329.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-20-61 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-20 entitled "Cigarette
and Other Tobacco Products Tax" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-20-61. Product restrictions on electronic nicotine-delivery system products.
(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Characterizing flavor” means a distinguishable taste or aroma, other than the taste or
aroma of tobacco or menthol, distinguishable by an ordinary consumer, imparted either prior to, or
during, consumption of an electronic nicotine-delivery system product or component part thereof,
including, but not limited to, tastes or aromas relating to any fruit, mint, wintergreen, chocolate,
vanilla, honey, candy, cocoa, dessert, alcoholic beverage, herb, or spice or which impart a cooling
or numbing sensation. The determination of whether an electronic nicotine-delivery system product
has a characterizing flavor shall not be based solely on the use of additives, flavorings, or particular
ingredients, but shall instead consider all aspects of a final product including, but not limited to,
taste, flavor and aroma, product labeling, and advertising statements. A flavor shall be presumed
to be a characterizing flavor if a dealer, manufacturer, or distributor has made a statement or claim
directed to consumers or the public about such flavor, whether expressed or implied, that it has a
distinguishable taste or aroma (other than the taste or aroma of tobacco or menthol).
(2) “Flavored electronic nicotine-delivery system product” means any electronic nicotine-
delivery system product that imparts a characterizing flavor.
(3) “Vape shop” means any premises dedicated to the display, sale, distribution, delivery,

offering, furnishing, or marketing of nicotine-delivery system products, liquid nicotine, liquid
nicotine containers or vapor products.
(b) The sale, or offer for sale of, or the possession with intent to sell or to offer for sale,
flavored electronic nicotine-delivery system products to consumers within the state of Rhode Island
is hereby prohibited, except at a vape shop. Compassion centers and licensed cultivators registered
with the state of Rhode Island department of business regulation-office of cannabis regulation under
chapter 28.6 of title 21 are exempt from this provision except as to products that contain, are made
of, or are derived from tobacco or nicotine, natural or synthetic.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001148
========
LC001148 - Page 2 of 3